Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska79-2,143
State school security director;
appointment.

The
position of state school security director is created within the State Department
of Education. The Commissioner of Education shall appoint the director based
on experience, knowledge, and skills in the field of school security.

Laws 2014, LB923, § 1.